zh-CN: 鞋头结构: 仿赤足款式; 外置分趾; 隐藏分趾; 内置分趾; 圆头; 分趾; 其他
ja: トゥ構造: ベアフットスタイル; 外側スプリットトゥ; 隠しスプリットトゥ; 内側スプリットトゥ; ラウンドトゥ; スプリットトゥ; その他
sk-SK: Konštrukcia špičky: Barefoot štýl; Vonkajšia oddelená špička; Skrytá oddelená špička; Vnútorná oddelená špička; Okrúhla špička; Oddelená špička; Iné
sv: Konstruktion för tå: Barfotastil; Extern kluven tå; Dold kluven tå; Intern kluven tå; Rund tå; Kluven tå; Övrigt
pt-BR: Composição da ponta: Estilo descalço; Dedo separado externo; Dedo separado oculto; Dedo separado interno; Bico redondo; Dedo separado; Outros
nl: Teenconstructie: Barefoot-stijl; Gespleten neus buitenkant; Verborgen gespleten neus; Gespleten neus binnenkant; Ronde neus; Gespleten neus; Overige
da: Tåkonstruktion: Barfodsdesign; Udvendig split-toe; Skjult split-toe; Indvendig split-toe; Rund tå; Split-toe; Andet
nb: Tåkonstruksjon: Barfotstil; Utvendig splittet tå; Skjult splittet tå; Innvendig splittet tå; Rund tå; Splittet tå; Annet
bg-BG: Конструкция на пръстите: Тип „босо стъпало“; Външно разделен пръст; Скрито разделен пръст; Вътрешно разделен пръст; Заоблен връх; Разделен пръст; Друго
ru: Конструкция носка: Босоногая обувь; Внешний разделённый мысок; Скрытый разделённый мысок; Внутренний разделённый мысок; Круглый мысок; Разделённый мысок; Другое
en: Toe construction: Barefoot style; External split toe; Hidden split toe; Internal split toe; Round toe; Split toe; Other
de: Zehenkonstruktion: Barfuß-Stil; Externer Zehentrenner; Verdeckter Zehentrenner; Interner Zehentrenner; Runde Zehenpartie; Geteilte Zehenpartie; Sonstige
fi: Kärkialueen rakenne: Paljasjalkamalli; Ulkoinen jaettu kärki; Piilotettu jaettu kärki; Sisäinen jaettu kärki; Pyöreä kärki; Jaettu kärki; Muu
sl-SI: Zgradba prstnega predela: Slog bosonoge obutve; Zunanji deljen prst; Skrit deljen prst; Notranji deljen prst; Okrogla konica; Deljen prst; Drugo
vi: Cấu trúc ngón chân: Kiểu chân trần; Ngón xẻ ngoài; Ngón xẻ ẩn; Ngón xẻ trong; Mũi tròn; Mũi xẻ ngón; Khác
zh-TW: 鞋頭結構: 赤足款式; 外露分趾; 隱藏式分趾; 內部分趾; 圓趾; 分趾; 其他
cs: Konstrukce špičky: Barefoot; Vnější oddělená špička; Skrytá oddělená špička; Vnitřní oddělená špička; Kulatá špička; Oddělená špička; Jiné
es: Construcción de la puntera: Estilo descalzo; Puntera dividida externa; Puntera dividida oculta; Puntera dividida interna; Puntera redonda; Puntera dividida; Otro
hr-HR: Konstrukcija prstiju: U stilu bosonogog hodanja; Vanjski odvojeni prst; Skriveni odvojeni prst; Unutarnji odvojeni prst; Okrugli prsti; Odvojeni prst; Ostalo
ko: 토 구조: 베어풋 스타일; 외부 스플릿 토; 히든 스플릿 토; 내부 스플릿 토; 라운드 토; 스플릿 토; 기타
pt-PT: Conceção da ponta do pé: Estilo barefoot; Biqueira dividida externa; Biqueira dividida oculta; Biqueira dividida interna; Biqueira redonda; Biqueira dividida; Outro
lt-LT: Kojos pirštų konstrukcija: Basos pėdos stiliaus; Išoriškai atskirtų pirštų; Paslėptų atskirtų pirštų; Viduje atskirtų pirštų; Apvalia nosimi; Atskirtų pirštų; Kita
pl: Konstrukcja noska: Styl barefoot (minimalistyczny); Zewnętrznie dzielony palec; Ukryty dzielony palec; Wewnętrznie dzielony palec; Okrągły nosek; Dzielony palec; Inna
it: Costruzione della punta della scarpa: Stile barefoot; Punta divisa esterna; Punta divisa nascosta; Punta divisa interna; Punta rotonda; Punta divisa; Altro
fr: Construction au niveau des orteils: Style pieds nus; Orteil séparé externe; Orteil séparé caché; Orteil séparé interne; Bout rond; Orteil séparé; Autre
hu: Lábujjrész kialakítása: Mezítlábas stílus; Külső osztott orr; Rejtett osztott orr; Belső osztott orr; Kerek orr; Osztott orr; Egyéb
tr: Burun yapısı: Çıplak ayak stili; Dıştan ayrık burun; Gizli ayrık burun; İçten ayrık burun; Yuvarlak burun; Ayrık burun; Diğer
el: Κατασκευή πέλματος: Τύπου barefoot; Εξωτερικός διαχωρισμός δακτύλων; Κρυφός διαχωρισμός δακτύλων; Εσωτερικός διαχωρισμός δακτύλων; Στρογγυλή μύτη; Διαχωρισμός δακτύλων; Άλλο
th: โครงสร้างส่วนปลายเท้า: สไตล์แบร์ฟุต; แยกนิ้วเท้าด้านนอก; ซ่อนรอยแยกนิ้วเท้า; แยกนิ้วเท้าด้านใน; หัวมน; แยกนิ้วเท้า; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Construcție a vârfului încălțămintei: Stil barefoot; Degete separate extern; Degete separate ascuns; Degete separate intern; Vârf rotund; Vârf despărțit; Altele